Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1587.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 3347. Obedience to school crossing guards.(a) Traffic signal of guard.--A driver of a vehicle approaching a crosswalk or other section of a roadway which is controlled by a school crossing guard shall obey all traffic signals given by the school crossing guard. The driver of the vehicle shall stop the vehicle if directed by the school crossing guard within 30 feet, but not less than 10 feet, from the school crossing guard, crosswalk or other area of the roadway as directed by the school crossing guard and shall remain stopped until the school crossing guard directs the vehicle to proceed.123456789101112131415161718 (b) Penalty.--A person who violates subsection (a) commits a summary offense and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of $250 and a surcharge of $35. The surcharge shall be deposited into the School Bus Safety Grant Program Account.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"School crossing guard." A person who is appointed by a school district or municipality to guard street crossings during hours when children are going to or coming from school and direct actions of children and traffic to ensure safe crossing.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250HB1587PN1895 - 2 - 123456789101112